en: Dehydrated meat and vegetables broth stock, Dehydrated meat and vegetables broth bouillon
fr: Bouillon de viande et légumes type pot-au-feu déshydraté

en: Dehydrated meat and vegetables with fat broth stock, Dehydrated meat and vegetables with fat broth bouillon
fr: Bouillon de viande et légumes type pot-au-feu non dégraissé déshydraté

en: Poultry broth
de: Geflügelbrühen
fi: siipikarjaliemi
fr: Bouillons de volaille
hr: Juha od peradi
it: Brodo di pollo, Brodo di pollame
lt: Paukštienos sultiniai
nl: Gevogeltebouillons, Gevogeltebouillon

en: Chicken broths
nl: Kippenbouillons

en: Beef broth
de: Rinderbrühe
fi: lihaliemi
fr: Bouillons de bœuf
hr: Goveđa juha
it: Brodo di manzo
lt: Jautienos sultiniai
nl: Rundvleesbouillons

en: Mutton broth
fr: Bouillons de mouton
hr: Juha od ovčetine
lt: Avienos sultiniai
nl: Schapenbouillon

en: Fish broths
fr: Bouillons de poisson
hr: Riblje čorbe
nl: Visbouillons

en: Bean dishes
de: Bohnengerichte
fr: Plats à base de haricots
hr: Jela od graha
it: Piatti pronti a base di fagioli
lt: Pupelių patiekalai
pl: Dania z fasolą, Dania z fasoli
ru: Блюда из бобов

en: Cassoulets, Canned white bean stew
fr: Cassoulets, Cassoulet aux haricots blancs appertisé, Cassoulets en conserve
hr: Cassoulets
lt: Konservuotų baltųjų pupelių troškiniai
nl: Cassoulets, Cassoulet

en: Cassoulets with Toulouse sausage, Cassoulets from Toulouse
fr: Cassoulets toulousains
hr: Cassoulets s toulouse kobasicom
nl: Cassoulet uit Toulouse

en: Cassoulets with duck confit, White bean stew with duck, Canned white bean stew with duck
fr: Cassoulets au confit de canard, Cassoulet au canard, Cassoulet au canard appertisé, Cassoulet au canard en conserve
hr: Cassoulets s pačjim confitom
nl: Cassoulet met geconfijte eend

en: Pork cassoulets, White bean stew with pork, Canned white bean stew with pork
fr: Cassoulet au porc, Cassoulet au porc en conserve, Cassoulet au porc appertisé
hr: Svinjski cassoulets
lt: Baltųjų pupelių troškiniai su kiauliena

en: White bean stew with goose, Canned white bean stew with goose
fr: Cassoulet à l'oie, Cassoulet à l'oie appertisé, Cassoulet à l'oie en conserve
hr: Varivo od bijelog graha s guskom
lt: Baltųjų pupelių troškiniai su žąsiena

en: Sambar
fr: Sambar

fr: Céréales préparées, céréale préparée
nl: Kant-en-klaar graanmaaltijden

en: Prepared rices
fr: Riz préparés
hr: Pripremljene riže
lt: Paruošti ryžiai
nl: Kant-en-klaar rijstmaaltijden

en: Fried rice, Cantonese rice
de: gebratener Reis
es: Arroz frito
fi: paistettu riisi
fr: Riz cantonais
hr: Pržena riža
it: Riso cantonese
ja: チャーハン, 炒飯
nl: Gebakken rijst
ru: Жареный рис
zh: 炒饭

en: Congee
fr: Congee

en: Basque-style piperade, Fondue of sweet peppers and tomatoes flavoured with onions and garlics
fr: Piperade basquaise

en: Sauerkrauts
af: Suurkool
ar: ساوركراوت
az: Kələm turşusu
be: Капуста квашаная
br: Kaol-go
ca: Xucrut
cs: Kysané zelí
cv: Йӳçĕтнĕ купăста
da: Sauerkraut
de: sauerkraut
el: Ξινό λάχανο
eo: Acida brasiko
es: Chucrut
et: Hapukapsas
eu: Aza minkor
fa: کلم‌ترش
fi: hapankaalit, hapankaali
fr: choucroutes
ga: Cabáiste géaraithe
he: כרוב כבוש
hr: Kiseli kupus
hu: Savanyú káposzta
hy: Թթու դրած կաղամբ
ia: Sauerkraut
id: Sauerkraut
io: Surkruto
is: Súrkál
it: Crauti
ja: ザワークラウト
jv: Sauérkraut
ko: 자우어크라우트
lb: Sauermous
li: Zoermoos
lt: Rauginti kopūstai
lv: Skābēti kāposti
ms: Sauerkraut
nl: Zuurkolen, Zuurkool
no: Sauerkraut
pl: Kapusta kiszona, Kapusta kwaszona
pt: Chucrute
ru: Квашеная капуста
sk: Kyslá kapusta
sl: Kislo zelje
sv: Surkål
th: เซาเออร์เคราท์
tl: Sauerkraut
uk: Квашена капуста
vi: Dưa cải bắp
zh: 德式酸菜